Hawaii, session 2026, GM1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii's condominium
and homeowners' association reserve requirements are intended to
promote financial transparency, long-term planning, and the
protection of unit owners from unexpected special assessments.
The legislature further finds that while third-party
reserve study reviews can be an effective tool for larger and
more complex associations, the cost of obtaining such reviews
may impose a disproportionate financial burden on very small
associations with simple infrastructure, limited shared
components, and active owner oversight. For these associations,
the expense of a mandatory third-party reserve study review may
exceed other essential annual operating costs and reduce funds
available for actual maintenance and repair of common elements.
The legislature notes that existing law already recognizes
the distinction between large and small associations by
permitting associations comprised of fewer than twenty units to
waive certain audit and financial verification requirements by a
2026-3408 HB1824 GDI HMSO

Page 2 1824
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
vote of unit owners. The legislature finds that a similar,
narrowly tailored approach is appropriate with respect to the
triennial third-party reserve study review requirement.
The purpose of this Act is to provide limited flexibility
for small associations, while preserving transparency and owner
protections, by allowing associations with fewer than twenty
units and a building or buildings of no more than two stories,
to waive the requirement for a third-party reserve study review
upon a majority vote of unit owners; provided that certain
requirements are met, but prohibiting associations from waiving
this requirement for consecutive periods.
SECTION 2. Section 514B-148, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) The budget required under section 514B-144(a) shall
include a summary with at least the following details:
(1) The estimated revenues and operating expenses of the
association;
(2) Disclosure as to whether the budget has been prepared
on a cash or accrual basis;
(3) The estimated costs of fire safety equipment or
installations that meet the requirements of a building
2026-3408 HB1824 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
fire and life safety evaluation required by the
applicable county for any building located in a county
with a population greater than five hundred thousand;
provided that the reserve study may forecast a loan or
special assessment to fund building fire and life
safety components or installation;
(4) The balance of the total replacement reserves fund of
the association as of the date of the budget;
(5) The estimated replacement reserves assessments that
the association will require to maintain the property
based on a reserve study performed by or on behalf of
the association; provided that [the]_£
(A) The reserve study, if not prepared by an
independent reserve study preparer, shall be
reviewed by an independent reserve study preparer
no less than every three years; provided further
that [a] an association comprising fewer than
twenty units and a building or buildings of no
more than two stories may, by the affirmative
vote of a majority of the unit owners present or
represented at a duly noticed association
2026-3408 HB1824 CDl HMSO 3
iiiiiMiiiiHiiiiiiinii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
meeting, elect to waive the requirement for a
review by an independent reserve study preparer;
provided that:
(i) The association continues to prepare and
disclose annual reserve information to unit
owners in accordance with this chapter;
(ii) The vote to waive the review by an
independent reserve study preparer is
recorded in the association's records and
made available to unit owners upon request;
(iii) The vote to waive the reserve study review
applies to a single three-year period; and
(iv) The association shall not waive the reserve
study review requirement for two consecutive
three-year periods.
Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed
to prohibit an association from obtaining a
review by an independent reserve study preparer
at any time; and
(B) A managing agent with industry reserve study
designations shall not be considered as having a
2026-3408 HB1824 CDl HMSO

II |—^ w ।
Page 5 1824
H.B. NO.
h.d.1
C.D. 1
conflict of interest for purposes of this
paragraph;
(6) A general explanation of how the estimated replacement
reserves assessments are computed and detailing:
(A) The identity, qualifications, and potential
conflicts of interest of the person or entity
performing the reserve study, update, or any
review thereof;
(B) Disclosure of any component of association
property omitted from the reserve study and the
basis for the omission;
(C) Planned increases in the estimated replacement
reserve assessments over the thirty-year plan;
and
(D) Whether the actual estimated replacement reserves
assessments for the prior year as defined in the
study were less than the assessments provided for
in the reserve study, and, if so, by how much,
and explaining the impact of the lesser
assessments on future estimated replacement
reserves assessments;
2026-3408 HB1824 CDl HMSO
HHHimiiiiim

Page 6 1824
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(7) The amount the association must collect for the fiscal
year to fund the estimated replacement reserves
assessments; and
(8) Information as to whether the amount the association
must collect for the fiscal year to fund the estimated
replacement reserves assessments was calculated using
a per cent funded or cash flow plan. The method or
plan shall not circumvent the estimated replacement
reserves assessments amount determined by the reserve
study pursuant to paragraph (5).
The budget summary shall contain all required information
without referring the reader to other portions of the budget."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3408 HB1824 CDl HMSO 6

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1824, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1824, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
64-26